Missouri, session 2026, HB2101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 66, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 66.751, to read as follows:
66.751. A county with a charter form of government may adopt a provision in
2 such county's charter establishing term limits for the county's elected officials.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.